New York, session 2025-2026, S7795.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 745 of the real property actions and proceedings 2 law is amended by adding a new subdivision 3 to read as follows: 3 3. The court shall render a final judgment on a petition no later than 4 six months from the date upon which issue is joined. 5 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11273-01-5